Illinois, session 104th, HB4411.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Sections 510-20.88 and 34-18.88 and by changing Sections 21B-25 and 627-605 as follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)8    Sec. 10-20.88. Computer science course reporting.9    (a) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the school 10board of a school district that maintains any of grades 11kindergarten through 8 shall report, for each school 12maintaining any of grades kindergarten through 5, the 13following data to the State Board of Education: 14        (1) the computer science content offered in those 15    grades, including the minutes of instructional time 16    dedicated to computer science, descriptions of 17    instructional content, and, if available, which State 18    learning standards for computer science are covered in the 19    instruction; and20        (2) the students receiving computer science 21    instruction in those grades and the grade level, gender, 22    race and ethnicity, eligibility for free or reduced-price 23    school meals, disability and individualized education   HB4411- 2 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1    program or federal Section 504 plan status, and English 2    learner status of those students.3    (b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the school 4board of a school district that maintains any of grades 5kindergarten through 8 shall report, for each school 6maintaining any of grades 6 through 8, the following data to 7the State Board of Education:8        (1) the computer science courses or content offered in 9    those grades, including the course codes, if any, 10    descriptions, and, if available, which State learning 11    standards for computer science are covered in each course; 12    and13        (2) the students in those grades enrolled in computer 14    science courses and the grade level, gender, race and 15    ethnicity, eligibility for free or reduced-price school 16    meals, disability and individualized education program or 17    federal Section 504 plan status, and English learner 18    status of those students.19    (c) The State Board of Education shall disaggregate the 20data collected under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) and 21paragraph (2) of subsection (b) by grade level, gender, race 22and ethnicity, eligibility for free or reduced-price school 23meals, disability and individualized education program or 24federal Section 504 plan status, and English learner status 25and make the data available publicly, along with the data 26collected under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) and paragraph   HB4411- 3 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1(1) of subsection (b). 2    (105 ILCS 5/21B-25)3    Sec. 21B-25. Endorsement on licenses. All licenses issued 4under paragraph (1) of Section 21B-20 of this Code shall be 5specifically endorsed by the State Board of Education for each 6content area, school support area, and administrative area for 7which the holder of the license is qualified. Recognized 8institutions approved to offer educator preparation programs 9shall be trained to add endorsements to licenses issued to 10applicants who meet all of the requirements for the 11endorsement or endorsements, including passing any required 12tests. The State Superintendent of Education shall randomly 13audit institutions to ensure that all rules and standards are 14being followed for entitlement or when endorsements are being 15recommended.16        (1) The State Board of Education, in consultation with 17    the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, shall 18    establish, by rule, the grade level and subject area 19    endorsements to be added to the Professional Educator 20    License. These rules shall outline the requirements for 21    obtaining each endorsement.22        (1.5) The State Board of Education, in consultation 23    with the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, 24    shall create an introductory content area endorsement for 25    teaching computer science in grades 5 through 12 that   HB4411- 4 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1    allows licensed educators to teach introductory computer 2    science courses, as defined by the State Board. This 3    endorsement shall require no more than 8 credit hours of 4    graduate-level preparation and include instruction in 5    introductory computer science concepts and computer 6    science pedagogy. Educators seeking the introductory 7    content area endorsement for teaching computer science may 8    substitute a State Board-approved, one-week professional 9    development program in introductory high school computer 10    science education for 4 credit hours of the graduate-level 11    preparation. This one-week professional development 12    program may count as 4 credit hours toward the full 13    endorsement. 14        (2) In addition to any and all grade level and content 15    area endorsements developed by rule, the State Board of 16    Education, in consultation with the State Educator 17    Preparation and Licensure Board, shall develop the 18    requirements for the following endorsements:19            (A) (Blank).20            (B) Principal endorsement. A principal endorsement 21        shall be affixed to a Professional Educator License of 22        any holder who qualifies by having all of the 23        following:24                (i) Successful completion of a principal 25            preparation program approved in accordance with 26            Section 21B-60 of this Code and any applicable   HB4411- 5 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1            rules.2                (ii) At least 4 total years of teaching or 4 3            total years of working in the capacity of school 4            support personnel in an Illinois public school or 5            nonpublic school recognized by the State Board of 6            Education, in a school under the supervision of 7            the Department of Corrections, or in an 8            out-of-state public school or out-of-state 9            nonpublic school meeting out-of-state recognition 10            standards comparable to those approved by the 11            State Superintendent of Education; however, the 12            State Board of Education, in consultation with the 13            State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, 14            shall allow, by rules, for fewer than 4 years of 15            experience based on meeting standards set forth in 16            such rules, including without limitation a review 17            of performance evaluations or other evidence of 18            demonstrated qualifications.19                (iii) A master's degree or higher from a 20            regionally accredited college or university.21            (C) Chief school business official endorsement. A 22        chief school business official endorsement shall be 23        affixed to the Professional Educator License of any 24        holder who qualifies by having a master's degree or 25        higher, 2 years of full-time administrative experience 26        in school business management or 2 years of   HB4411- 6 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1        university-approved practical experience, and a 2        minimum of 24 semester hours of graduate credit in a 3        program approved by the State Board of Education for 4        the preparation of school business administrators and 5        by passage of the applicable State tests. The chief 6        school business official endorsement may also be 7        affixed to the Professional Educator License of any 8        holder who qualifies by having a master's degree in 9        business administration, finance, accounting, or 10        public administration and who completes an additional 11        6 semester hours of internship in school business 12        management from a regionally accredited institution of 13        higher education and passes the applicable State 14        tests. This endorsement shall be required for any 15        individual employed as a chief school business 16        official.17            (D) Superintendent endorsement. A superintendent 18        endorsement shall be affixed to the Professional 19        Educator License of any holder who has completed a 20        program approved by the State Board of Education for 21        the preparation of superintendents of schools, has had 22        at least 2 years of experience employed full-time in a 23        general administrative position or as a full-time 24        principal, director of special education, or chief 25        school business official in the public schools or in a 26        State-recognized nonpublic school in which the chief   HB4411- 7 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1        administrator is required to have the licensure 2        necessary to be a principal in a public school in this 3        State and where a majority of the teachers are 4        required to have the licensure necessary to be 5        instructors in a public school in this State, and has 6        passed the required State tests; or of any holder who 7        has completed a program that is not an 8        Illinois-approved educator preparation program at an 9        Illinois institution of higher education and that has 10        recognition standards comparable to those approved by 11        the State Superintendent of Education and holds the 12        general administrative, principal, or chief school 13        business official endorsement and who has had 2 years 14        of experience as a principal, director of special 15        education, or chief school business official while 16        holding a valid educator license or certificate 17        comparable in validity and educational and experience 18        requirements and has passed the appropriate State 19        tests, as provided in Section 21B-30 of this Code. The 20        superintendent endorsement shall allow individuals to 21        serve only as a superintendent or assistant 22        superintendent.23            (E) Teacher leader endorsement. It shall be the 24        policy of this State to improve the quality of 25        instructional leaders by providing a career pathway 26        for teachers interested in serving in leadership   HB4411- 8 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1        roles, but not as principals. The State Board of 2        Education, in consultation with the State Educator 3        Preparation and Licensure Board, may issue a teacher 4        leader endorsement under this subdivision (E). Persons 5        who meet and successfully complete the requirements of 6        the endorsement shall be issued a teacher leader 7        endorsement on the Professional Educator License for 8        serving in schools in this State. Teacher leaders may 9        qualify to serve in such positions as department 10        chairs, coaches, mentors, curriculum and instruction 11        leaders, or other leadership positions as defined by 12        the district. The endorsement shall be available to 13        those teachers who (i) hold a Professional Educator 14        License, (ii) hold a master's degree or higher from a 15        regionally accredited institution, (iii) have 16        completed a program of study that has been approved by 17        the State Board of Education, in consultation with the 18        State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, and 19        (iv) have successfully demonstrated competencies as 20        defined by rule.21            A teacher who meets the requirements set forth in 22        this Section and holds a teacher leader endorsement 23        may evaluate teachers pursuant to Section 24A-5 of 24        this Code, provided that the individual has completed 25        the evaluation component required by Section 24A-3 of 26        this Code and a teacher leader is allowed to evaluate   HB4411- 9 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1        personnel under the respective school district's 2        collective bargaining agreement.3            The State Board of Education, in consultation with 4        the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, 5        may adopt such rules as may be necessary to establish 6        and implement the teacher leader endorsement program 7        and to specify the positions for which this 8        endorsement shall be required.9            (F) Special education endorsement. A special 10        education endorsement in one or more areas shall be 11        affixed to a Professional Educator License for any 12        individual that meets those requirements established 13        by the State Board of Education in rules. Special 14        education endorsement areas shall include without 15        limitation the following:16                (i) Learning Behavior Specialist I;17                (ii) Learning Behavior Specialist II;18                (iii) Speech Language Pathologist;19                (iv) Blind or Visually Impaired;20                (v) Deaf-Hard of Hearing;21                (vi) Early Childhood Special Education; and22                (vii) Director of Special Education.23        Notwithstanding anything in this Code to the contrary, 24        the State Board of Education, in consultation with the 25        State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board, may 26        add additional areas of special education by rule.  HB4411- 10 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1            (G) School support personnel endorsement. School 2        support personnel endorsement areas shall include, but 3        are not limited to, school counselor, marriage and 4        family therapist, school psychologist, school speech 5        and language pathologist, school nurse, and school 6        social worker. This endorsement is for individuals who 7        are not teachers or administrators, but still require 8        licensure to work in an instructional support position 9        in a public or State-operated elementary school, 10        secondary school, or cooperative or joint agreement 11        with a governing body or board of control or a charter 12        school operating in compliance with the Charter 13        Schools Law. The school support personnel endorsement 14        shall be affixed to the Professional Educator License 15        and shall meet all of the requirements established in 16        any rules adopted to implement this subdivision (G). 17        The holder of such an endorsement is entitled to all of 18        the rights and privileges granted holders of any other 19        Professional Educator License, including teacher 20        benefits, compensation, and working conditions.21(Source: P.A. 100-13, eff. 7-1-17; 100-267, eff. 8-22-17; 22100-288, eff. 8-24-17; 100-596, eff. 7-1-18; 100-780, eff. 231-1-19; 100-863, eff. 8-14-18; 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-220, 24eff. 8-7-19.) 25    (105 ILCS 5/27-605)  (was 105 ILCS 5/27-22)  HB4411- 11 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1    Sec. 27-605. Required high school courses. 2    (a) (Blank). 3    (b) (Blank).4    (c) (Blank).5    (d) (Blank).6    (e) Through the 2023-2024 school year, as a prerequisite 7to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil entering the 89th grade must, in addition to other course requirements, 9successfully complete all of the following courses:10        (1) Four years of language arts.11        (2) Two years of writing intensive courses, one of 12    which must be English and the other of which may be English 13    or any other subject. When applicable, writing-intensive 14    courses may be counted towards the fulfillment of other 15    graduation requirements. 16        (3) Three years of mathematics, one of which must be 17    Algebra I, one of which must include geometry content, and 18    one of which may be an Advanced Placement computer science 19    course. A mathematics course that includes geometry 20    content may be offered as an integrated, applied, 21    interdisciplinary, or career and technical education 22    course that prepares a student for a career readiness 23    path.24        (3.5) For pupils entering the 9th grade in the 25    2022-2023 school year and 2023-2024 school year, one year 26    of a course that includes intensive instruction in   HB4411- 12 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1    computer literacy, which may be English, social studies, 2    or any other subject and which may be counted toward the 3    fulfillment of other graduation requirements. 4        (4) Two years of science.5        (5) Two years of social studies, of which at least one 6    year must be history of the United States or a combination 7    of history of the United States and American government 8    and, beginning with pupils entering the 9th grade in the 9    2016-2017 school year and each school year thereafter, at 10    least one semester must be civics, which shall help young 11    people acquire and learn to use the skills, knowledge, and 12    attitudes that will prepare them to be competent and 13    responsible citizens throughout their lives. Civics course 14    content shall focus on government institutions, the 15    discussion of current and controversial issues, service 16    learning, and simulations of the democratic process. 17    School districts may utilize private funding available for 18    the purposes of offering civics education. Beginning with 19    pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2021-2022 school 20    year, one semester, or part of one semester, may include a 21    financial literacy course.22        (6) One year chosen from (A) music, (B) art, (C) 23    foreign language, which shall be deemed to include 24    American Sign Language, (D) vocational education, or (E) 25    forensic speech (speech and debate). A forensic speech 26    course used to satisfy the course requirement under   HB4411- 13 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1    subdivision (1) may not be used to satisfy the course 2    requirement under this subdivision (6). 3    (e-5) Beginning with the 2024-2025 school year, as a 4prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 5entering the 9th grade must, in addition to other course 6requirements, successfully complete all of the following 7courses: 8        (1) Four years of language arts.9        (2) Two years of writing intensive courses, one of 10    which must be English and the other of which may be English 11    or any other subject. If applicable, writing-intensive 12    courses may be counted toward the fulfillment of other 13    graduation requirements.14        (3) Three years of mathematics, one of which must be 15    Algebra I, one of which must include geometry content, and 16    one of which may be a an Advanced Placement computer 17    science course. A mathematics course that includes 18    geometry content may be offered as an integrated, applied, 19    interdisciplinary, or career and technical education 20    course that prepares a student for a career readiness 21    path.22        (3.5) One year of a course that includes intensive 23    instruction in computer literacy, which may be English, 24    social studies, or any other subject and which may be 25    counted toward the fulfillment of other graduation 26    requirements.   HB4411- 14 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1        (4) Two years of laboratory science.2        (5) Two years of social studies, of which at least one 3    year must be history of the United States or a combination 4    of history of the United States and American government 5    and at least one semester must be civics, which shall help 6    young people acquire and learn to use the skills, 7    knowledge, and attitudes that will prepare them to be 8    competent and responsible citizens throughout their lives. 9    Civics course content shall focus on government 10    institutions, the discussion of current and controversial 11    issues, service learning, and simulations of the 12    democratic process. School districts may utilize private 13    funding available for the purposes of offering civics 14    education. One semester, or part of one semester, may 15    include a financial literacy course.16        (6) One year chosen from (A) music, (B) art, (C) 17    foreign language, which shall be deemed to include 18    American Sign Language, (D) career and technical 19    education, or (E) forensic speech (speech and debate). A 20    forensic speech course used to satisfy the course 21    requirement under subdivision (1) may not be used to 22    satisfy the course requirement under this subdivision (6). 23    (e-10) Beginning with the 2028-2029 school year, as a 24prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 25entering the 9th grade must, in addition to other course 26requirements, successfully complete 2 years of foreign   HB4411- 15 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1language courses, which may include American Sign Language. A 2pupil may choose a third year of foreign language to satisfy 3the requirement under subdivision (6) of subsection (e-5). 4    (e-15) Beginning with the 2028-2029 school year, as a 5prerequisite to receiving a high school diploma, each pupil 6entering the 9th grade must successfully complete one year of 7high school computer science and artificial intelligence, 8which may be taken in any of grades 7 through 12 and shall 9count toward the fulfillment of either (i) one year of the 10foreign language requirement under subsection (e-10), (ii) the 11third year of mathematics requirement under subdivision (3) of 12subsection (e-5), or (iii) the requirement under subdivision 13(6) of subsection (e-5). A computer science course counted 14toward the fulfillment of a requirement under item (i), (ii), 15or (iii) of this subsection (e-15) may also be used to fulfill 16the computer literacy requirement under subdivision (3.5) of 17subsection (e-5).18        (1) The State Board of Education shall create 19    guidelines for school districts regarding which courses 20    fulfill a requirement under item (i) or (ii) of this 21    subsection (e-15). Eligible courses must include 22    instruction in evolving computer science technologies, 23    such as artificial intelligence, including what artificial 24    intelligence is, how artificial intelligence works, and 25    ethical considerations related to the use of artificial 26    intelligence.  HB4411- 16 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1        (2) Any computer science course taken by students in 2    grade 7 or 8 that is used for credit toward the requirement 3    must be taught by an educator with an introductory content 4    area endorsement for teaching computer science under 5    Section 21B-25.6        (3) If a student uses a computer science course to 7    fulfill the foreign language requirement under item (i) of 8    this subsection (e-15), then the school board must 9    designate that computer science course as equivalent to a 10    high school foreign language course and must denote on the 11    student's transcript that the computer science course 12    qualifies as a foreign language course for students under 13    item (i) of this subsection (e-15) for the purpose of 14    admission to an institution of higher education in this 15    State.16        (4) If a student uses a computer science course to 17    fulfill the mathematics requirement under item (ii) of 18    this subsection (e-15), then the school board must 19    designate that computer science course as equivalent to a 20    high school mathematics course and must denote on the 21    student's transcript that the computer science course 22    qualifies as a mathematics-based, quantitative course for 23    students in accordance with subdivision (3) of subsection 24    (e-5).25        (5) By June 30, 2027, the State Board of Education 26    shall update its existing list of course titles   HB4411- 17 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1    recommended for computer science under Section 2-3.185 2    with a list of courses that can be used to satisfy the 3    requirements of this subsection (e-15); however, each 4    school district shall ensure that such courses align with 5    the State learning standards for computer science and the 6    State Board shall include on the list only courses that 7    meet the definition of computer science under Section 8    10-17a. The State Board shall update its list of 9    qualifying courses as needed to reflect changing State and 10    regional economic and educational needs.11        (6) The requirements of this subsection (e-15) do not 12    apply to a pupil transferring to a high school in this 13    State from another state after the pupil's 11th grade 14    year.15        (7) A school may enter into a cooperative resource 16    sharing agreement to ensure that its students can enroll 17    in a computer science course under this subsection (e-15). 18    (f) The State Board of Education shall develop and inform 19school districts of standards for writing-intensive 20coursework. 21    (f-5) If a school district offers a an Advanced Placement 22computer science course to high school students, then the 23school board must designate that course as equivalent to a 24high school mathematics course and must denote on the 25student's transcript that the Advanced Placement computer 26science course qualifies as a mathematics-based, quantitative   HB4411- 18 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1course for students in accordance with subdivision (3) of 2subsection (e) of this Section. 3    (g) Public Act 83-1082 does not apply to pupils entering 4the 9th grade in 1983-1984 school year and prior school years 5or to students with disabilities whose course of study is 6determined by an individualized education program. 7    Public Act 94-676 does not apply to pupils entering the 89th grade in the 2004-2005 school year or a prior school year 9or to students with disabilities whose course of study is 10determined by an individualized education program. 11    Subdivision (3.5) of subsection (e) does not apply to 12pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2021-2022 school year or a 13prior school year or to students with disabilities whose 14course of study is determined by an individualized education 15program. 16    Subsection (e-5) does not apply to pupils entering the 9th 17grade in the 2023-2024 school year or a prior school year or to 18students with disabilities whose course of study is determined 19by an individualized education program. Subsection (e-10) does 20not apply to pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2027-2028 21school year or a prior school year or to students with 22disabilities whose course of study is determined by an 23individualized education program. Subsection (e-15) does not 24apply to pupils entering the 9th grade in the 2027-2028 school 25year or a prior school year or to students with disabilities 26whose course of study is determined by an individualized   HB4411- 19 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1education program. 2    (h) The provisions of this Section are subject to the 3provisions of Sections 14A-32 and 27-610 of this Code and the 4Postsecondary and Workforce Readiness Act. 5    (i) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to modify 6the requirements of this Section for any students enrolled in 7grades 9 through 12 if the Governor has declared a disaster due 8to a public health emergency pursuant to Section 7 of the 9Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act. 10(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-743, eff. 8-2-24; 11104-387, eff. 8-15-25; 104-391, eff. 8-15-25; revised 129-24-25.) 13    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)14    Sec. 34-18.88. Computer science course reporting. 15    (a) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the board 16shall report, for each school maintaining any of grades 17kindergarten through 5, the following data to the State Board 18of Education: 19        (1) the computer science content offered in those 20    grades, including the minutes of instructional time 21    dedicated to computer science, descriptions of 22    instructional content, and, if available, which State 23    learning standards for computer science are covered in the 24    instruction; and25        (2) the students receiving computer science   HB4411- 20 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1    instruction in those grades and the grade level, gender, 2    race and ethnicity, eligibility for free or reduced-price 3    school meals, disability and individualized education 4    program or federal Section 504 plan status, and English 5    learner status of those students.6    (b) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, the board 7shall report, for each school maintaining any of grades 6 8through 8, the following data to the State Board of Education:9        (1) the computer science courses or content offered in 10    those grades, including the course codes, if any, 11    descriptions, and, if available, which State learning 12    standards for computer science are covered in each course; 13    and14        (2) the students enrolled in computer science courses 15    in those grades and the grade level, gender, race and 16    ethnicity, eligibility for free or reduced-price school 17    meals, disability and individualized education program or 18    federal Section 504 plan status, and English learner 19    status of those students.20    (c) The State Board of Education shall disaggregate the 21data collected under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) and 22paragraph (2) of subsection (b) by grade level, gender, race 23and ethnicity, eligibility for free or reduced-price school 24meals, disability and individualized education program or 25federal Section 504 plan status, and English learner status 26and make the data available publicly, along with the data   HB4411- 21 -LRB104 16739 LNS 30146 b1collected under paragraph (1) of subsection (a) and paragraph 2(1) of subsection (b).